Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.05.020

Change of registered agent.

(1) A corporation may change its registered agent in accordance with RCW 23.95.430.

(2) A registered agent may change its information on file with the secretary of state in accordance with RCW 23.95.435 or 23.95.440.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2118; 2002 c 297 s 16; 1989 c 165 s 41.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.